Utah statutes.
16-16-1608.   Approval or abandonment of merger by members.
(1)  Subject to Subsections (2) and (3), a plan of merger must be approved by:
(a)  at least two-thirds of the voting power of members present at a members
meeting called under Subsection 16-16-1607(2); and
(b)  if the limited cooperative association has investor members, at least a
majority of the votes cast by patron members, unless the organic rules require
a greater percentage vote by patron members.
(2)  The organic rules may provide that the percentage of votes under
Subsection (1)(a) is:
(a)  a different percentage that is not less than a majority of members voting
at the meeting;
(b)  measured against the voting power of all members; or
(c)  a combination of Subsections (2)(a) and (b).
(3)  The vote required to approve a plan of merger may not be less than the
vote required for the members of the limited cooperative association to amend
the articles of organization.
(4)  Consent in a record to a plan of merger by a member must be delivered to
the limited cooperative association before delivery of articles of merger for
filing pursuant to Section 16-16-1609 if as a result of the merger the member
will have:
(a)  personal liability for an obligation of the association; or
(b)  an obligation or liability for an additional contribution.
(5)  Subject to Subsection (4) and any contractual rights, after a merger is
approved, and at any time before the effective date of the merger, a limited
cooperative association that is a party to the merger may approve an amendment
to the plan of merger or approve abandonment of the planned merger:
(a)  as provided in the plan; and
(b)  except as prohibited by the plan, with the same affirmative vote of the
board of directors and of the members as was required to approve the plan.
(6)  The voting requirements for districts, classes, or voting groups under
Section 16-16-404 apply to approval of a merger under this part.
